Washington statutes.
RCW 35.22.310

Cesspools, filling of—Removal of debris, etc.

Every city of the first class is empowered to provide for the filling and closing of cesspools and for the removing of garbage, debris, grass, weeds, and brush on property in the city.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.22.310. Prior: 1907 c 89 s 1; RRS s 8972.]